Montana, session 2025, HB634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are
repealed:
30-14-301. Short title.
30-14-302. Purpose.
30-14-303. Definitions.
30-14-304. Blind bidding prohibited.
30-14-305. License agreements -- unlawful provisions.
30-14-306. Bid requirements.
30-14-307. Void acts.
30-14-308. Violation a misdemeanor.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 634